isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Dw Y 80
SFX Dw ti l .
SFX Dw ti la .
SFX Dw ti lo .
SFX Dw ti li .
SFX Dw děti m .
SFX Dw děti š .
SFX Dw děti 0 .
SFX Dw děti mo .
SFX Dw děti te .
SFX Dw ěti ut .
SFX Dw ti h .
SFX Dw ti še .
SFX Dw ti hmo .
SFX Dw ti ste .
SFX Dw ti hu .
SFX Dw ěti 0 .
SFX Dw ěti mo .
SFX Dw ěti te .
SFX Dw ěti uči .
SFX Dw ěti učego .
SFX Dw ěti učemu .
SFX Dw ěti učim .
SFX Dw ěti učem .
SFX Dw ěti učih .
SFX Dw ěti učimi .
SFX Dw ěti uča .
SFX Dw ěti uču .
SFX Dw ěti učej .
SFX Dw ěti učeju .
SFX Dw ěti uče .
SFX Dw ěti omy .
SFX Dw ěti omogo .
SFX Dw ěti omomu .
SFX Dw ěti omym .
SFX Dw ěti omom .
SFX Dw ěti omo .
SFX Dw ěti oma .
SFX Dw ěti omu .
SFX Dw ěti omoj .
SFX Dw ěti omoju .
SFX Dw ěti omi .
SFX Dw ěti ome .
SFX Dw ěti omyh .
SFX Dw ěti omym .
SFX Dw ěti omymi .
SFX Dw ěti omo .
SFX Dw ti vši .
SFX Dw ti všego .
SFX Dw ti všemu .
SFX Dw ti všim .
SFX Dw ti všem .
SFX Dw ti vših .
SFX Dw ti všimi .
SFX Dw ti vša .
SFX Dw ti všu .
SFX Dw ti všej .
SFX Dw ti všeju .
SFX Dw ti vše .
SFX Dw ti ny .
SFX Dw ti nogo .
SFX Dw ti nomu .
SFX Dw ti nym .
SFX Dw ti nom .
SFX Dw ti ni .
SFX Dw ti ne .
SFX Dw ti nyh .
SFX Dw ti nymi .
SFX Dw ti na .
SFX Dw ti nu .
SFX Dw ti noj .
SFX Dw ti noju .
SFX Dw ti no .
SFX Dw ti nje .
SFX Dw ti nja .
SFX Dw ti nju .
SFX Dw ti njem .
SFX Dw ti nij .
SFX Dw ti njam .
SFX Dw ti njami .
SFX Dw ti njah .

SFX Dx Y 19
SFX Dx ol l .
SFX Dx ol li .
SFX Dx 0 i .
SFX Dx ol la .
SFX Dx 0 a .
SFX Dx ol lov .
SFX Dx 0 ov .
SFX Dx ol lu .
SFX Dx 0 u .
SFX Dx ol lah .
SFX Dx 0 ah .
SFX Dx ol lam .
SFX Dx 0 am .
SFX Dx ol lom .
SFX Dx 0 om .
SFX Dx ol lami .
SFX Dx 0 ami .
SFX Dx ol le .
SFX Dx 0 e .

SFX Dy Y 81
SFX Dy ojdti šel .
SFX Dy jdti šla .
SFX Dy jdti šlo .
SFX Dy jdti šli .
SFX Dy ti u .
SFX Dy ti em .
SFX Dy ti eš .
SFX Dy ti e .
SFX Dy ti emo .
SFX Dy ti ete .
SFX Dy ti ut .
SFX Dy ti eh .
SFX Dy ti eše .
SFX Dy ti ehmo .
SFX Dy ti este .
SFX Dy ti ehu .
SFX Dy ti i .
SFX Dy ti imo .
SFX Dy ti ite .
SFX Dy ti uči .
SFX Dy ti učego .
SFX Dy ti učemu .
SFX Dy ti učim .
SFX Dy ti učem .
SFX Dy ti učih .
SFX Dy ti učimi .
SFX Dy ti uča .
SFX Dy ti uču .
SFX Dy ti učej .
SFX Dy ti učeju .
SFX Dy ti uče .
SFX Dy ti omy .
SFX Dy ti omogo .
SFX Dy ti omomu .
SFX Dy ti omym .
SFX Dy ti omom .
SFX Dy ti omo .
SFX Dy ti oma .
SFX Dy ti omu .
SFX Dy ti omoj .
SFX Dy ti omoju .
SFX Dy ti omi .
SFX Dy ti ome .
SFX Dy ti omyh .
SFX Dy ti omym .
SFX Dy ti omymi .
SFX Dy ti omo .
SFX Dy ojdti ševši .
SFX Dy ojdti ševšego .
SFX Dy ojdti ševšemu .
SFX Dy ojdti ševšim .
SFX Dy ojdti ševšem .
SFX Dy ojdti ševših .
SFX Dy ojdti ševšimi .
SFX Dy ojdti ševša .
SFX Dy ojdti ševšu .
SFX Dy ojdti ševšej .
SFX Dy ojdti ševšeju .
SFX Dy ojdti ševše .
SFX Dy ti eny .
SFX Dy ti enogo .
SFX Dy ti enomu .
SFX Dy ti enym .
SFX Dy ti enom .
SFX Dy ti eni .
SFX Dy ti ene .
SFX Dy ti enyh .
SFX Dy ti enymi .
SFX Dy ti ena .
SFX Dy ti enu .
SFX Dy ti enoj .
SFX Dy ti enoju .
SFX Dy ti eno .
SFX Dy ti enje .
SFX Dy ti enja .
SFX Dy ti enju .
SFX Dy ti enjem .
SFX Dy ti enij .
SFX Dy ti enjam .
SFX Dy ti enjami .
SFX Dy ti enjah .

SFX Dz Y 9
SFX Dz ok ki .
SFX Dz ok ka .
SFX Dz ok kov .
SFX Dz ok ku .
SFX Dz ok kah .
SFX Dz ok kam .
SFX Dz ok kom .
SFX Dz ok kami .
SFX Dz ok če .

SFX EA Y 9
SFX EA 0 e .
SFX EA 0 a .
SFX EA 0 ev .
SFX EA 0 u .
SFX EA 0 ah .
SFX EA 0 am .
SFX EA 0 em .
SFX EA 0 ami .
SFX EA c če .

SFX EB Y 62
SFX EB ti l .
SFX EB ti la .
SFX EB ti lo .
SFX EB ti li .
SFX EB eti mu .
SFX EB eti mem .
SFX EB eti meš .
SFX EB eti me .
SFX EB eti memo .
SFX EB eti mete .
SFX EB eti mut .
SFX EB ti h .
SFX EB ti še .
SFX EB ti hmo .
SFX EB ti ste .
SFX EB ti hu .
SFX EB eti mi .
SFX EB eti mimo .
SFX EB eti mite .
SFX EB eti muči .
SFX EB eti mučego .
SFX EB eti mučemu .
SFX EB eti mučim .
SFX EB eti mučem .
SFX EB eti mučih .
SFX EB eti mučimi .
SFX EB eti muča .
SFX EB eti muču .
SFX EB eti mučej .
SFX EB eti mučeju .
SFX EB eti muče .
SFX EB eti memy .
SFX EB eti memogo .
SFX EB eti memomu .
SFX EB eti memym .
SFX EB eti memom .
SFX EB eti memo .
SFX EB eti mema .
SFX EB eti memu .
SFX EB eti memoj .
SFX EB eti memoju .
SFX EB eti memi .
SFX EB eti meme .
SFX EB eti memyh .
SFX EB eti memym .
SFX EB eti memymi .
SFX EB ti vši .
SFX EB ti všego .
SFX EB ti všemu .
SFX EB ti všim .
SFX EB ti všem .
SFX EB ti vših .
SFX EB ti všimi .
SFX EB ti vša .
SFX EB ti všu .
SFX EB ti všej .
SFX EB ti všeju .
SFX EB ti vše .
SFX EB i y .
SFX EB i a .
SFX EB i o .
SFX EB i je .

SFX EC Y 7
SFX EC o a .
SFX EC ko ek .
SFX EC o u .
SFX EC o ah .
SFX EC o am .
SFX EC 0 m .
SFX EC o ami .

SFX ED Y 62
SFX ED ti l .
SFX ED ti la .
SFX ED ti lo .
SFX ED ti li .
SFX ED jeti ojmu .
SFX ED jeti ojmem .
SFX ED jeti ojmeš .
SFX ED jeti ojme .
SFX ED jeti ojmemo .
SFX ED jeti ojmete .
SFX ED jeti ojmut .
SFX ED ti h .
SFX ED ti še .
SFX ED ti hmo .
SFX ED ti ste .
SFX ED ti hu .
SFX ED jeti ojmi .
SFX ED jeti ojmimo .
SFX ED jeti ojmite .
SFX ED jeti ojmuči .
SFX ED jeti ojmučego .
SFX ED jeti ojmučemu .
SFX ED jeti ojmučim .
SFX ED jeti ojmučem .
SFX ED jeti ojmučih .
SFX ED jeti ojmučimi .
SFX ED jeti ojmuča .
SFX ED jeti ojmuču .
SFX ED jeti ojmučej .
SFX ED jeti ojmučeju .
SFX ED jeti ojmuče .
SFX ED jeti ojmemy .
SFX ED jeti ojmemogo .
SFX ED jeti ojmemomu .
SFX ED jeti ojmemym .
SFX ED jeti ojmemom .
SFX ED jeti ojmemo .
SFX ED jeti ojmema .
SFX ED jeti ojmemu .
SFX ED jeti ojmemoj .
SFX ED jeti ojmemoju .
SFX ED jeti ojmemi .
SFX ED jeti ojmeme .
SFX ED jeti ojmemyh .
SFX ED jeti ojmemym .
SFX ED jeti ojmemymi .
SFX ED ti vši .
SFX ED ti všego .
SFX ED ti všemu .
SFX ED ti všim .
SFX ED ti všem .
SFX ED ti vših .
SFX ED ti všimi .
SFX ED ti vša .
SFX ED ti všu .
SFX ED ti všej .
SFX ED ti všeju .
SFX ED ti vše .
SFX ED i y .
SFX ED i a .
SFX ED i o .
SFX ED i je .

SFX EE Y 3
SFX EE e yh .
SFX EE e ym .
SFX EE e ymi .

SFX EF Y 6
SFX EF enj nji .
SFX EF enj njij .
SFX EF enj njah .
SFX EF enj njam .
SFX EF enj njju .
SFX EF enj njami .

SFX EG Y 81
SFX EG  se 0 .
SFX EG ti se l .
SFX EG ti se la .
SFX EG ti se lo .
SFX EG ti se li .
SFX EG obrati se beru .
SFX EG obrati se berem .
SFX EG obrati se bereš .
SFX EG obrati se bere .
SFX EG obrati se beremo .
SFX EG obrati se berete .
SFX EG obrati se berut .
SFX EG ti se h .
SFX EG ti se še .
SFX EG ti se hmo .
SFX EG ti se ste .
SFX EG ti se hu .
SFX EG obrati se beri .
SFX EG obrati se berimo .
SFX EG obrati se berite .
SFX EG obrati se beruči .
SFX EG obrati se beručego .
SFX EG obrati se beručemu .
SFX EG obrati se beručim .
SFX EG obrati se beručem .
SFX EG obrati se beručih .
SFX EG obrati se beručimi .
SFX EG obrati se beruča .
SFX EG obrati se beruču .
SFX EG obrati se beručej .
SFX EG obrati se beručeju .
SFX EG obrati se beruče .
SFX EG obrati se beremy .
SFX EG obrati se beremogo .
SFX EG obrati se beremomu .
SFX EG obrati se beremym .
SFX EG obrati se beremom .
SFX EG obrati se beremo .
SFX EG obrati se berema .
SFX EG obrati se beremu .
SFX EG obrati se beremoj .
SFX EG obrati se beremoju .
SFX EG obrati se beremi .
SFX EG obrati se bereme .
SFX EG obrati se beremyh .
SFX EG obrati se beremym .
SFX EG obrati se beremymi .
SFX EG ti se vši .
SFX EG ti se všego .
SFX EG ti se všemu .
SFX EG ti se všim .
SFX EG ti se všem .
SFX EG ti se vših .
SFX EG ti se všimi .
SFX EG ti se vša .
SFX EG ti se všu .
SFX EG ti se všej .
SFX EG ti se všeju .
SFX EG ti se vše .
SFX EG ti se ny .
SFX EG ti se nogo .
SFX EG ti se nomu .
SFX EG ti se nym .
SFX EG ti se nom .
SFX EG ti se ni .
SFX EG ti se ne .
SFX EG ti se nyh .
SFX EG ti se nymi .
SFX EG ti se na .
SFX EG ti se nu .
SFX EG ti se noj .
SFX EG ti se noju .
SFX EG ti se no .
SFX EG ti se nje .
SFX EG ti se nja .
SFX EG ti se nju .
SFX EG ti se njem .
SFX EG ti se nij .
SFX EG ti se njam .
SFX EG ti se njami .
SFX EG ti se njah .

SFX EH Y 4
SFX EH 0 be .
SFX EH e obě .
SFX EH e i .
SFX EH e oboju .
