isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
odpověděti/Dw
diavol/Dx
vojdti/Dy
prědok/Dz
peprec/EA
potomok/Dz
prijeti/EB
posol/Dx
městečko/EC
objeti/ED
dane/EE
uravenj/EF
sobrati se/EG
pověděti/Dw
se/EH
zajeti/EB
prějeti/EB
podjeti/ED
izjeti/ED
dědok/Dz
drobne/EE
jaječko/EC
najeti/EB
pradědok/Dz
prědpověděti/Dw
věděti/Dw
jeti/EB
odjeti/ED
podrastok/Dz
pojeti/EB
projeti/EB
ujeti/EB
vozrastok/Dz
sjeti/ED
nedonosok/Dz
skovranok/Dz
svědok/Dz
zarodok/Dz
izpověděti/Dw
iznajeti/EB
pozajeti/EB
vozjeti/ED
jurok/Dz
izrodok/Dz
zimorodok/Dz
větrec/EA
ščigol/Dx
prědprijeti/EB
